Montana, session 2025, SB525.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. School chaplains. (1) A school district or a public charter school may
adopt a policy to authorize paid or volunteer school chaplains to provide supports, services, and programs to
students as assigned by the district school board or the charter school governing board, if different. The policy
adopted pursuant to this section must, at a minimum:
(a) describe the supports, services, or programs a school chaplain may be assigned;
(b) require that a principal of a school with a school chaplain shall inform all parents of the
availability of the supports, services, and programs provided by the school chaplain; and
(c) require written parental consent before a student participates in or receives supports, services,
or programs from a school chaplain who is included on the list of school chaplains required in subsection (3).
(2) A school chaplain must meet the background check requirements that apply to noninstructional
school district employees or contractors. To be eligible for appointment as a school chaplain, an individual must
be 18 years of age or older and of good moral character.
(3) A school district or public charter school that adopts a school chaplain policy shall publish the
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – SB 525

****
69th Legislature 2025 SB 525.1
list of school chaplains, including each school chaplain's religious affiliation, if applicable, on the school district
or public charter school website.
(4) A school district or a public charter school may engage a school chaplain instead of a school
counselor to perform the duties required of a school counselor.
(5) A school chaplain employed under this section is required to be certified by the superintendent
of public instruction pursuant to 20-4-106(2).

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Codification instruction. [Section 1] is intended to be codified as an
integral part of Title 20, chapter 7, part 13, and the provisions of Title 20, chapter 7, part 13, apply to [section 1].

NEW SECTION. Section 3. Effective date. [This act] is effective July 1, 2025.
- END -
- 2 - Authorized Print Version – SB 525